Hawaii statutes.
§202-1 Council; appointment; tenure. The
advisory commission on employment and human resources is hereby constituted as
the workforce development council. The council shall also fulfill the
functions of the state workforce development board for purposes of the federal
Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act of 2014, P.L. No. 113-128.

Except for the ex officio members or their
designees, the council members shall be appointed by the governor for four-year
staggered terms as provided for in section 26-34. The governor shall appoint
the chairperson of the council. The council shall be constituted as provided
by P.L. 113-128 (29 U.S.C. 3111) of the following members:

(1) The directors of labor and industrial relations,
human services, and business, economic development, and tourism; the
superintendent of education; and the president of the University of Hawaii or
their designees, as ex officio, voting members;

(2) The private sector chairpersons of the four
county workforce development boards, or their designees from the private sector
membership of their respective boards, as ex officio, voting members;

(3) Seventeen representatives from the private
sector, including nonprofit organizations and businesses in the State,
appointed from individuals nominated by state business organizations and
business trade associations;

(4) Eight representatives from labor organizations
and workforce training organizations, two or more of whom shall be
representatives of labor organizations who have been nominated by state labor
federations, and one of whom shall be a labor representative from a
community-based native Hawaiian organization that operates workforce
development programs;

(5) A member of each house of the legislature, for
two-year terms beginning in January of odd-numbered years, appointed by the
appropriate presiding officer of each house, as ex officio, voting members;

(6) The four mayors or their designees, as ex
officio, voting members; and

(7) The governor or the governor's designee.

Council members shall serve without
compensation but shall be reimbursed for travel expenses necessary for the
performance of their duties.

From June 6, 2016, and until such time that the
council has forty-one members, sixteen council members shall constitute a
quorum to do business, and the concurrence of at least sixteen council members
shall be necessary to make any action of the council valid.

All council members may continue to serve on
the council until their respective successors have been appointed. A person
appointed to fill a vacancy shall serve the remainder of the term of the
person's predecessor. [L 1965, c 270, §2; Supp, §98W-2; HRS §202-1; am L 1970,
c 170, §1; am L 1977, c 19, §1; am L 1985, c 252, §2; am L 1997, c 346, §2; am
L 1999, c 72, §3; am L 2000, c 104, §1; am L 2005, c 179, §4; am L 2016, c 57, §2]

Revision Note

In the penultimate paragraph, "June 6, 2016"
substituted for "the effective date of Act [57], Session Laws of Hawaii
2016".

Attorney General Opinions

Cited, as a constitutional board and commission statute where
members may serve as holdovers until their successors are
"appointed", without any reference to the successors being fully
"qualified"; an "appointment" properly occurs under the
interim appointments provision of article V, §6 of the state constitution.
Att. Gen. Op. 16-3.

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next